New Jersey, session 222, A917.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  Notwithstanding any law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, a driving school may use a motor vehicle owned or leased by a person employed as a driving instructor by the driving school for behind-the-wheel driving instruction or for the road test portion of the driving test administered by the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission provided that: a.  the driving instructor maintains a valid State issued drivers license and a valid driving school instructor certification, pursuant to section 5 of P.L.1951, c.216 (C.39:12-5); b.  the motor vehicle is properly insured in accordance with sections 3 and 4 of P.L.1972, c.70 (C.39:6A-3 and 39:6A-4); c.  the motor vehicle meets safety standards required for a vehicle that provides driving instruction including, but not limited to, dual control brakes, seatbelts for the student and driving instructor, signage stating "Student Driver" visible in the front and rear of the motor vehicle, and any other requirement deemed necessary by the commission; and d. the motor vehicle is registered in the name of the driving instructor in accordance with R.S.39:3-4. 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.